Hawaii statutes.
§455-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Behavioral medicine" means therapy
techniques including biofeedback, relaxation training, hypnosis,
mindfulness-based stress reduction, and cognitive therapy.

"Board" means the board of
naturopathic medicine.

"Common diagnostic procedures" means
the use of venipuncture consistent with the practice of naturopathic medicine,
commonly used diagnostic modalities consistent with naturopathic practice,
taking of health history, physical examination, radiography, laboratory
medicine, and obtaining samples of human tissue as authorized as a minor office
procedure.

"Continuing education courses" means
courses approved by a professional association or organization representing a
licensed profession whose program objectives are related to naturopathic
medicine; provided that the professional association or organization is
approved by the board.

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Diagnosis" means using all
recognized and accepted physical and laboratory diagnostic procedures including
the taking of blood for diagnostic purposes.

"Disaster condition" means a sudden
catastrophic event that overwhelms public order, causes loss of property or
life, and exceeds or disrupts the capabilities of available medical resources
to provide medical care within a community.

"Homeopathic" means minute doses of
substances that have been highly diluted and shaken according to standardized
pharmaceutical methods.

"Hygiene and immunization" means the
use of preventative techniques including personal hygiene, asepsis, public
health, and, to the extent allowed by rule, immunizations.

"Legend drug" means any drug falling
within section 503(b)(1) of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and which
is required to be labeled with the statement "Rx only".

"Manual manipulation" or
"mechanotherapy" means manipulation of a part or the whole of the
body by hand or mechanical means.

"Minor office procedures" means care
and procedures relative to superficial lacerations, lesions, and abrasions, and
the removal of foreign bodies located in superficial structures not including
the eye; and the topical and parenteral use of substances consistent with the
practice of naturopathic medicine, in accordance with rules established by the
board.

"Naturopathic formulary" means
vitamins, minerals, dietary supplements, botanical medicines, homeopathic
medicines, hormones, and those legend drugs consistent with naturopathic
medical practice.

"Naturopathic medicine" means the practice
of the art and science of diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of disorders of
the body by support, stimulation, or both, of the natural processes of the
human body. The practice of naturopathic medicine includes the prescription,
administration, dispensing, and use of nutrition and food science, physical
modalities, manual manipulation, parenteral therapy, minor office procedures,
naturopathic formulary, hygiene and immunization, contraceptive devices, common
diagnostic procedures, and behavioral medicine of the type taught in education
and training at naturopathic medical colleges; provided that the use of
parenteral therapy and performance of minor office procedures shall not be
allowed until the board adopts rules in accordance with chapter 91 pursuant to
section 455-6.

"Naturopathic physician" means a
person who holds a current license issued under this chapter to practice
naturopathic medicine.

"Nutrition and food science" means
the prevention and treatment of disease or other human conditions through the
use of diet.

"Parenteral therapy" means the
administration of substances by means other than through the gastrointestinal
tract, including intravenous, subcutaneous and intramuscular injection.

"Physical modalities" means use of
physical, chemical, electrical, and other means, including but not limited to
heat, cold, air, light, including lasers, water in any of its forms, sound,
massage, and therapeutic exercise.

"Radiography" means the ordering of
radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies, including but not limited to
computed tomography scans, x-rays, magnetic resonance imaging, positron
emission tomography scans, and ultrasounds. The term also means and includes
the taking and interpreting of x-rays. [L 1925, c 77, pt of §1; RL 1935, §1300;
RL 1945, §2651; RL 1955, §66-1; HRS §455-1; am L 1986, c 76, §5; am L 1987, c
281, §2(1); am L 1994, c 71, §1; am L Sp 2009, c 22, §3; am L 2014, c 222, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Performance of surgery and use of drugs in practice prohibited.
Att. Gen. Op. 86-7.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next